Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB599.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 503 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The use of physical force by a defendant operating a motor vehicle that comes
into contact with another person is justifiable when:
(a) The other person was obstructing a highway or other public passage;
(b) The obstruction of the highway or other public passage was unauthorized
and in violation of state law or a local ordinance;
(c) The defendant was operating a motor vehicle in a lawful manner to flee
from the immediate area of an obstruction of a highway or other public
passage; and
(d) A reasonable person in the same circumstances would believe that the
obstruction of the highway or other public passage:
1. Created an imminent threat to personal safety; or
2. Prevented escape from a dangerous situation.
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 153
(2) The use of deadly physical force by a defendant operating a motor vehicle that
comes into contact with another person is justifiable under subsection (1) of this
section only when a reasonable person in the same circumstances as the
defendant would believe that the obstruction of the highway or other public
passage posed an imminent risk of serious physical injury or death.
(3) As used in this section, "obstructing a highway or other public passage" means
any conduct that is prohibited under Section 3 of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 525.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "emergency responder" means state or local law
enforcement personnel, fire department personnel, corrections officers, [and
]emergency medical personnel, and those contracted for official use by emergency
responders.
(2) A[No] person shall not:
(a) Intentionally obstruct or disrupt;
(b) Conspire to obstruct or disrupt; or
(c) Facilitate another person obstructing or disrupting;
an emergency responder from performing his or her official duties.
(3) Obstructing an emergency responder is:
(a) A Class B misdemeanor[A violation] for the[a] first offense;[, and]
(b) A Class A[B] misdemeanor for the[a] second [or subsequent ]offense; and
(c) A Class D felony for a third or subsequent offense.
(4) The court, in imposing a sentence on a defendant who has been convicted of
obstructing an emergency responder:
(a) Shall:
1. Notwithstanding KRS 534.040, impose a fine of one thousand dollars
($1,000); or
2. If the defendant is indigent pursuant to KRS Chapter 31, require the
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 153
defendant to perform community service commensurate with the
amount of the fine imposed under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;
and
(b) May order restitution to any agency or organization for the reasonable costs
of the emergency response incurred by that agency or organization for the
obstruction of an emergency responder.
Section 3. KRS 525.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of obstructing a highway or other public passage when having no
legal privilege to do so he or she, alone or with other persons:[,]
(a) Intentionally or wantonly renders;
(b) Conspires to render; or
(c) Facilitates another person rendering;
any highway or public passage impassable without unreasonable inconvenience or
hazard.
(2) A[No] person shall not be convicted under this section solely because he or she
is:[of]
(a) Attending a gathering of persons to hear another person[him] speak or
otherwise communicate; or[ or solely because of]
(b) Speaking or otherwise communicating to a gathering of persons, if the
speaker had the legal privilege or prior authorization to hold the
gathering[Being a member of such a gathering].
(3) [An order to disperse issued by ]A peace officer or other public servant engaged in
executing or enforcing the law shall not issue an order to disperse[and] addressed
to a person whose speech or other lawful behavior attracts an obstructing audience
[shall not be deemed lawful ]if the obstruction can be readily remedied by police
control of the [size or ]location of the gathering.
(4) Obstructing a highway or other public passage is:
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 153
(a) A Class B misdemeanor for the first offense;
(b) A Class A misdemeanor for the second offense; and
(c) A Class D felony for a third or subsequent offense.
(5) The court, in imposing a sentence on a defendant who has been convicted of
obstructing a highway or other public passage:
(a) Shall:
1. Notwithstanding KRS 534.040, impose a fine of one thousand dollars
($1,000); or
2. If the defendant is indigent pursuant to KRS Chapter 31, require the
defendant to perform community service commensurate with the
amount of the fine imposed under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;
and
(b) May order restitution to any agency or organization for the reasonable costs
of the emergency response incurred by that agency or organization for the
obstruction of a highway or other public passage.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any person who violates Section 2 or 3 of this Act or any person, corporation,
limited liability company, or other business entity who aids, abets, directs,
promotes, or funds a violation of Section 2 or 3 of this Act shall be liable for
actual and punitive damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees in a civil
cause of action brought by any person, corporation, limited liability company, or
other business entity who was injured by the violation of Section 2 or 3 of this
Act.
(2) The action may be filed in the Circuit Court for the county where the alleged
violation occurred or the county where the victim resides.
(3) Any person, corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity found
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 153
liable under this section shall be jointly and severally liable with each other
person, if any, found liable for the damages arising from the same violation of
Section 2 or 3 of this Act.
(4) A conviction under Section 2 or 3 of this Act shall be admissible in a civil action
brought under this section as prima facie evidence of liability.
Section 5. KRS 413.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following actions shall be commenced within one (1) year after the cause of
action accrued:
(a) An action for an injury to the person of the plaintiff, or of his or her
spouse[her husband, his wife], child, ward, apprentice, or servant;
(b) An action for injuries to persons, cattle, or other livestock by railroads or
other corporations, with the exception of hospitals licensed pursuant to KRS
Chapter 216;
(c) An action for malicious prosecution, conspiracy, arrest, seduction, criminal
conversation, or breach of promise of marriage;
(d) An action for libel or slander;
(e) An action against a physician, surgeon, dentist, or hospital licensed pursuant
to KRS Chapter 216, for negligence or malpractice;
(f) A civil action[,] arising out of any act or omission in rendering[,] or failing to
render[,] professional services for others, whether brought in tort or contract,
against a real estate appraiser holding a certificate or license issued under
KRS Chapter 324A or a real estate broker or sales associate holding a license
issued under KRS Chapter 324;
(g) An action for the escape of a prisoner[,] arrested or imprisoned on civil
process;
(h) An action for the recovery of usury paid for the loan or forbearance of money
or other thing[,] against the loaner or forbearer or assignee of either;
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 153
(i) An action for the recovery of stolen property[,] by the property owner [thereof
]against any person having the property[same] in his or her possession;
(j) An action for the recovery of damages or the value of stolen property, against
the thief or any accessory;
(k) An action arising out of a detention facility disciplinary proceeding, whether
based upon state or federal law;
(l) An action for damages arising out of a deficiency, defect, omission, error, or
miscalculation in any survey or plat, whether brought in tort or contract,
against a licensed professional land surveyor holding a license under KRS
Chapter 322;
(m) An action for violating KRS 311.782;[ and]
(n) An action for violating KRS 311.731; and
(o) An action under Section 4 of this Act.
(2) A cause of action under[In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (e) of]
subsection (1)(e) of this section[, the cause of action] shall be deemed to accrue at
the time the injury is first discovered or in the exercise of reasonable care should
have been discovered,[;] provided that the[such] action shall be commenced within
five (5) years from the date on which the alleged negligent act or omission is said to
have occurred.
(3) A cause of action under[In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (f) or (l)
of] subsection (1)(f) or (l) of this section[, the cause of action] shall be deemed to
accrue within one (1) year from the date of the occurrence or from the date when
the cause of action was, or reasonably should have been, discovered by the party
injured.
(4) A cause of action under[In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (h) of]
subsection (1)(h) of this section[, the cause of action] shall be deemed to accrue at
the time of payment. This limitation shall apply to all payments made on all
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 153
demands, whether evidenced by writing or existing only in parol.
(5) A cause of action under[In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (i) of]
subsection (1)(i) of this section[, the cause of action] shall be deemed to accrue at
the time the property is found by its owner.
(6) A cause of action under[In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (j) of]
subsection (1)(j) of this section[, the cause of action] shall be deemed to accrue at
the time of discovery of the liability.
(7) A cause of action under[In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (k) of]
subsection (1)(k) of this section[, the cause of action] shall be deemed to accrue on
the date an appeal of the disciplinary proceeding is decided by the institutional
warden.
(8) A cause of action under[In respect to the action referred to in] subsection (1)(m)
and (n) of this section[, the cause of action] shall be deemed to accrue after the
performance or inducement or attempt to perform or induce the abortion.
Section 6. KRS 503.085 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who uses force as permitted in KRS 503.050, 503.055, 503.070,[ and]
503.080, and Section 1 of this Act is justified in using such force and is immune
from criminal prosecution and civil action for the use of such force, unless the
person against whom the force was used is a peace officer, as defined in KRS
446.010, who was acting in the performance of his or her official duties and the
officer identified himself or herself in accordance with any applicable law, or the
person using force knew or reasonably should have known that the person was a
peace officer. As used in this subsection, the term "criminal prosecution" includes
arresting, detaining in custody, and charging or prosecuting the defendant.
(2) A law enforcement agency may use standard procedures for investigating the use of
force as described in subsection (1) of this section, but the agency shall[may] not
arrest the person for using force unless it determines that there is probable cause
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 153
that the force [that was ]used was unlawful.
(3) The court shall award reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, compensation for loss
of income, and all expenses incurred by the defendant in defense of any civil action
brought by a plaintiff, if the court finds that the defendant is immune from
prosecution as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/2/2026 9:42 AM Jacketed